Utah statutes.
72-6-102.   Uniform plans and specifications for construction and maintenance.

The department shall:

(1)  prepare and adopt uniform standard plans and specifications for the construction and maintenance of state highways; and

(2)  issue a manual containing plans and specifications for the information and guidance of officials having supervision of the construction and maintenance of state highways.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

